Hawaii statutes.
[§340E-39] Drinking water fund; fees.
(a) If established, fees shall cover the costs of current activities,
including the issuance of loans and other financial assistance, monitoring of
loans and other financial assistance repayments and conditions, technical
review of the planning and design documents, monitoring of construction
activities, conducting operation and maintenance inspections of drinking water
facilities, and activities of the drinking water fund under the Federal Act and
shall be used exclusively to support the activities of the drinking water fund.

(b) All moneys collected as fees shall be
deposited into an administrative expense account or accounts as needed to
comply with the Federal Act and shall be used exclusively to support the activities
of the drinking water fund. [L 1997, c 218, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next